North Dakota, session 69, HB1432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-04-10.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-04-10.3. Personalized plates.
At the request of a registrant, the department may provide special license plates marked with not
more than seven numerals, letters, or combinations of numerals and letters, upon application for a
special license plate and payment of an additional fee of twenty-five dollars per registration period,
unless the plate is a gold star license plate, military sacrifice license plate, or a prisoner of war license
plate, then there is no additional charge. A personal plate containing a restricted character may not be
renewed. The department shall make the special license plates authorized by this section available for
motor vehicles registered under section 39-04-10.6, trailers, travel trailers, and motorcycles. The fee for
the special license plates issued under this section for vehicles registered under section 39-04-10.6 is a
one-time fee of one hundred dollars. The special license plates for motorcycles may contain not more
than six numerals, letters, or a combination of not more than six numerals and letters. In the event of
sale or transfer of the vehicle, the owner shall remove the special license plates in accordance with
section 39-04-36. Upon payment of the applicable transfer fee, the special license plates may be
transferred to a replacement motor vehicle.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 39-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Military sacrifice plates.
1. The director shall issue distinctive number plates to individuals eligible under this section upon
receiving:
a. Payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor vehicle;
and
b. Verification, as determined by the department, of an individual's eligibility status under
this section.
2. An individual is eligible for a military sacrifice plate if the individual is an immediate family
member of a individual who died outside a combat zone while serving honorably and has not
been not found guilty of willful misconduct as defined in title 38, Code of Federal Regulations,
part 3, subpart a, section 3.1, subsection n, as a current member of any branch of the armed
forces of the United States, either active or reserve, the national guard under federal or state
control, or the United States coast guard.
3. On request of the director, the department of veterans' affairs shall certify an immediate family
member of an individual listed in subsection 2 as eligible to receive military sacrifice plates .

H. B. NO. 1432 - PAGE 2
4. Military sacrifice plates must be inscribed with a distinctive emblem and the words "military
sacrifice".
5. For purposes of this section "immediate family member" means a:
a. Spouse;
b. Parent, step-parent, or other individual who acted in loco parentis;
c. Sibling, whether of the whole or half-blood, or by adoption;
d. Child, including those by adoption, or a step-child; or
e. Grandparent.
6. The director may issue military sacrifice plates under this section only to the owner of a
passenger motor vehicle or a truck the registered gross vehicle weight rating of which does
not exceed twenty thousand pounds [9071.85 kilograms].

H. B. NO. 1432 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1432.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State